District of Columbia statutes.
33-432

Repealed

Dissolution — Effect on authority of partner.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 643, Pub. L. 87-709, § 33
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1981 Ed., § 41-132.
1973 Ed., § 41-332.